test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_taalu2_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

    
  Noun - puáđu+v2: # ok VUARU
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  puáđu
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  puáđo
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  puáđo
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  puáđun
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  puáđoost
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Com:  puáđoin
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  puáđottáá
    puáđu+v2+N+Ess:  puáđđun
    puáđu+v2+N+Par:  puáđđud
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  puáđoh
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Gen:  puáđoi
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  puáđoid
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  puáđoid
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  puáđoin
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Com:  [puáđoiguin, puáđoigijn]
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  puáđoittáá

  Noun - muátu+v2: # ok VUARU
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  muátu
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  muáđo
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  muáđo
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  muátun
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  muáđoost
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Com:  muáđoin
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  muáđottáá
    muátu+v2+N+Ess:  muáttun
    muátu+v2+N+Par:  muáttud
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  muáđoh
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Gen:  muáđoi
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  muáđoid
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  muáđoid
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  muáđoin
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Com:  [muáđoiguin, muáđoigijn]
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  muáđoittáá

  Noun - táálu+v2: # ok TAALU2
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  táálu 
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  tálo
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  tálo
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  táálun
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  tááloost
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Com:  táloin
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  tálottáá
    táálu+v2+N+Ess:  táállun
    táálu+v2+N+Par:  táállud
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  táloh
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Gen:  [tááloi, táloi]
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  táloid
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  táloid
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  táloin
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Com:  [táloiguin, táloigijn]
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  táloittáá

  Noun - stáálu+v2: # ok TAALU2
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  stáálu
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  stálo
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  stálo
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  stáálun
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  stááloost
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Com:  stáloin
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  stálottáá
    stáálu+v2+N+Ess:  stáállun
    stáálu+v2+N+Par:  stáállud
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  stáloh
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Gen:  [stááloi, stáloi]
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  stáloid
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  stáloid
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  stáloin
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Com:  [stáloiguin, stáloigijn]
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  stáloittáá

  Noun - láátu+v2: # ok TAALU2
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  láátu
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  láđo
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  láđo
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  láátun
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  lááđoost
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Com:  láđoin
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  láđottáá
    láátu+v2+N+Ess:  lááttun
    láátu+v2+N+Par:  lááttud
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  láđoh
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Gen:  [lááđoi, láđoi]
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  láđoid
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  láđoid
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  láđoin
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Com:  [láđoiguin, láđoigijn]
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  láđoittáá

  Noun - pááru+v2: # ok TAALU2
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  pááru
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  páro
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  páro
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  páárun
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  páároost
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Com:  pároin
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  párottáá
    pááru+v2+N+Ess:  páárrun
    pááru+v2+N+Par:  páárrud
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  pároh
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Gen: [páároi, pároi]
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  [páároid, pároid] # páároid hardcoded
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  pároid
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  pároin
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Com:  [pároiguin, pároigijn]
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  pároittáá

  Noun - máátu+v2: # ok TAALU2
    máátu+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  máátu
    máátu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  máđo
    máátu+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  máđo
    máátu+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  máátun
    máátu+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  mááđoost
    máátu+v2+N+Sg+Com:  máđoin
    máátu+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  máđottáá
    máátu+v2+N+Ess:  mááttun
    máátu+v2+N+Par:  mááttud
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  máđoh
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Gen: [mááđoi, máđoi]
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  [mááđoid, máđoid] # mááđoid hardcoded
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  máđoid
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  máđoin
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Com:  [máđoiguin, máđoigijn]
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  máđoittáá

  Noun - suájá: # á-stems - ok TAALU2
    suájá+N+Sg+Nom: suájá    
    suájá+N+Sg+Gen: suájá
    suájá+N+Sg+Acc: suájá
    suájá+N+Sg+Ill: suáján
    suájá+N+Sg+Loc: suájáást
    suájá+N+Sg+Com: suájáin
    suájá+N+Sg+Abe: suájáttáá
    suájá+N+Ess: suáiján
    suájá+N+Par: suáijád
    suájá+N+Pl+Nom: suájáh
    suájá+N+Pl+Gen: suájái
    suájá+N+Pl+Acc: suájáid
    suájá+N+Pl+Ill: suájáid
    suájá+N+Pl+Loc: suájáin
    suájá+N+Pl+Com: [suájáiguin, suájáigijn]
    suájá+N+Pl+Abe: suájáittáá
